Utah statutes.
63F-1-505.   Information technology plan.

(1)  In accordance with this section, the division shall submit an information technology plan to the chief information officer.

(2)  The information technology plan submitted by the division under this section shall include:

(a)  the information required by Section 63F-1-203;

(b)  a list of the services the division offers or plans to offer; and

(c)  a description of the performance measures used by the division to measure the quality of the services described in Subsection (2)(b).

(3) (a)  In submitting its information technology plan under this section, the division shall comply with Section 63F-1-204.

(b)  The information technology plan submitted by the division under this section is subject to the approval of the chief information officer as provided in Section 63F-1-204.



Enacted by Chapter 169, 2005 General Session

